en: cocoa processed with alkali, alkalized cocoa
de: Kakao mit Alkalisalzen versetzt
es: Cacao procesado con álcali
fr: Cacao alcalinisé
hr: kakao obrađen lužinom
it: Cacao trattato con agenti alcalinizzanti
pl: kakao alkalizowane

en: fat reduced cocoa, reduced fat cocoa, low fat cocoa, lean cocoa
bg: какао с намалено съдържание на мазнини, какао с намалено маслено съдържание
ca: cacau desgreixat
da: fedtfattig kakao
de: fettarmer Kakao, magerer Kakao, mageres Kakao
es: cacao magro, cacao desgrasado
fi: vähärasvainen kaakao
fr: cacao maigre, cacao dégraissé, cacao réduit en matières grasses
hr: kakao smanjene masti, nemasni kakao, reducirani kakao
hu: Csökkentett zsírtartalmú kakaó
it: cacao magro
lv: kakao ar samazinātu tauku saturu
nb: fettfattig kakao
nl: vetarme cacao, magere cacao
pl: Odtłuszczone kakao, kakao o obniżonej zawartości tłuszczu, kakao niskotłuszczowe, kakao o zmniejszonej zawartości tłuszczu
pt: cacau magro
ro: cacao cu conținut redus de grăsime
sv: fettreducerad kakao

en: highly fat reduced cocoa, highly reduced fat cocoa
de: Sehr fettarme Kokosnuss
fr: cacao fortement dégraissé
hr: kakao sa smanjenim udjelom masti

en: cocoa paste, cocoa mass, chocolate liquor
bg: какаова маса, какао маса
bs: kakao masa
ca: pasta de cacau, massa de cacau
cs: kakaová hmota
da: kakaomasse
de: Kakaomasse
el: κακαόμαζα
es: Pasta de cacao, masa del cacao, masa de cacao
et: kakaomass, kakaopasta
fi: kaakaomassa, kaakaomassaa
fr: pâte de cacao, cacao en pâte, masse de cacao
hr: kakaova masa, kakao masa, kakao pasta
hu: kakaómassza
is: kakómassi
it: pasta di cacao, massa di cacao
ja: カカオマス
kk: үгілген какао
ky: майдаланган какао
lt: kakavos masė
lv: kakavos masė
nb: kakaomasse
nl: cacaomassa, cacao massa
pl: miazga kakaowa, masa kakaowa, pasta kakaowa
pt: pasta de cacau, massa de cacau
ro: masă de cacao, masa de cacao, masă cacao, masa cacao, pastă de cacao, pasta de cacao
ru: какао тертое, какао-масса
sk: kakaová hmota
sq: kakao masë
sv: kakaomassa
tg: какаои судашуда
th: โกโก้แมส
tr: kakao kitlesi
uz: qirilgan kakao

en: cocoa paste processed with alkali, alkalized cocoa paste
de: Kakaopaste mit Alkalisalzen versetzt
es: Pasta de cacao procesada con álcali.
fr: Pâte de cacao alcalinisée
hr: kakao pasta obrađena alkalijom
it: pasta di cacao lavorata con alcali

en: cocoa powder
ar: مسحوق الكاكاو
az: Kakao tozu
be: Какава-парашок
bg: какао на прах
ca: cacau en pols
cs: Kakaový prášek
da: Kakaopulver
de: Kakaopulver
el: σκόνη κακάο
es: cacao en polvo
et: kakaopulber
fa: پودر کاکائو
fi: kaakaojauhe, kaakaojauhetta
fr: poudre de cacao, cacao en poudre
he: אבקת קקאו
hu: kakaópor
id: Kakao padat
it: cacao in polvere
ja: ココアパウダー
ko: 코코아 가루
lt: kakavos milteliai
lv: kakao pulveris
mk: какао во прав
ms: Pepejal koko
nb: kakaopulver
nl: cacaopoeder
pl: kakao w proszku, Proszek kakaowy, sproszkowane kakao
pt: cacau em pó
ro: pudră de cacao, pudra de cacao, cacao pudră, cacao pudra
ru: какао-порошок, тертое какао
sv: kakaopulver
tr: kakao tozu
uk: Какао-порошок

en: raw cacao powder, Instant cocoa powder without sugar
de: Rohes Kakaopulver
fr: poudre de cacao cru, poudre de cacao brute, Cacao non sucré en poudre soluble
hr: sirovi kakao prah
it: cacao crudo in polvere

en: fat reduced cocoa powder, low-fat cocoa powder, low fat cocoa powder, cocoa powder with low fat content
bg: обеэмаслено какао на прах, какао на прах с намалено маслено съдържание, нискомаслено какао на прах, какао на прах с ниска масленост
ca: cacau desgreixat en pols, cacau en pols reduït en greix
cs: Kakaový prášek se sníženým obsahem tuku
da: fedtfattigt kakaopulver, fedtreduceret kakaopulver
de: fettarmes Kakaopulver, Kakaopulver stark entölt, stark entöltes Kakaopulver, fettreduziertes Kakaopulver, Kakaopulver mit reduziertem Fettgehalt
es: cacao magro en polvo, cacao desgrasado en polvo, cacao en polvo desgrasado, cacao en polvo reducido en grasa, cacao deshidratado rebajado en grasa, cacao en polvo semidesgrasado, cacao semidesgrasado en polvo
et: lahja kakaopulber, vähendatud rasvasisaldusega kakaopulber
fi: vähärasvainen kaakaojauhe, vähärasvaista kaakaojauhetta
fr: poudre de cacao maigre, poudre de cacao dégraissé, cacao dégraissé en poudre, cacao en poudre dégraissé, cacao maigre en poudre, cacao sec dégraissé, cacao en poudre fortement dégraissé, cacao fortement dégraissé en poudre, poudre de cacao à teneur réduite en matières grasses, poudre de cacao allegee
hr: kakao u prahu smanjene masnoce, nemasni kakao prah, nemasni kakao u prahu, kakao prah smanjene masti, kakaov prahu smanjene masti, kakaov prah smanjene masti, kakao smanjene masnoće u prahu, kakaov prahu smanjene mast, kakao prah sa reduciranim sadržajem kakao maslaca, kakaov prah smanje masti, kakaov prah smanjene masti min, kakaov prah smanjenje masti
hu: zsírszegény kakaópor
it: cacao magro in polvere, cacao scremato in polvere, cacao fortemente sgrassato ed cacao in polvere
lt: liesi kakavos milteliai
lv: kakao pulveris ar zemu tauku saturu
nb: fettredusert kakaopulver, fett redusert kakaopulver
nl: magere cacaopoeder, magere cacao poeder, cacaopoeder met verminderd vetgehalte
pl: niskotłuszczowe kakao w proszku, kakao w proszku o obniżonej zawartości tłuszczu, proszek kakaowy niskotłuszczowy, proszek kakaowy o zmniejszonej zawartości tłuszczu
pt: cacau magro em pó
ro: cacao pudra degresata, pudră de cacao cu conţinut redus de grăsime
ru: какао порошок с пониженным содержанием жира
sk: kakaový prášok so zníženým množstvom tuku
sv: fettreducerat kakaopulver, fettreducerad kakaopulver, fettreduserat kakaopulver, avfettat kakaopulver, fettfattigt kakaopulver, fettfattig kakaopulver, lågfett kakaopulver

en: 3% fat reduced cocoa powder
sv: 3% fettreducerat kakaopulver

en: cocoa powder processed with alkali, alkalized cocoa powder
de: Kakaopulver mit Alkalisalzen versetzt
es: Cacao en polvo procesado con álcali
fr: Cacao en poudre alcalinisé
hr: kakao prah obrađen alkalijom
it: Polvere di cacao processata con alcalinizzanti

en: skimmed cocoa powder
da: skummet kakaopulver
de: Magerkakaopulver, entrahmtes Kakaopulver, mageres Kakaopulver
hr: obrani kakao prah
it: Polvere di cacao magra
ja: 脱脂ココアパウダー
ru: обезжиренный какаопорошок, сухой обезжиренный остаток какао
sv: skummet kakaopulver

en: cocoa powder with reduced cocoa butter content
sv: kakaopulver med reducerad kakaosmörhalt

en: cocoa solids
fr: cacao sec
hr: kakaovi dijelovi, kakaovih dijelova
it: cacao solido

en: cocoa mass and cocoa butter
de: Kakaomasse und Kakaobutter
es: pasta de cacao y manteca de cacao
fi: kaakaomassa ja -voi
fr: pâte et beurre de cacao, pâte de cacao et beurre de cacao
hr: kakao masu i kakao maslac
it: massa di cacao e burro di cacao

en: organic cocoa mass and organic cocoa butter
fi: luomu kaakaomassa ja -voi
fr: pâte de cacao issus de l‘agriculture biologique et beurre de cacao issus de l‘agriculture biologique
hr: organska kakao masa i organski kakao maslac
it: massa di cacao biologica e burro di cacao biologico

en: cocoa extract
bg: екстракт от какао
de: Kakao-Extrakt
fi: kaakaouute
fr: extrait de cacao
it: estratto di cacao
nl: cacao-extract

en: cocoa bean, cocoa beans, cacao bean
af: Kakaoboon
bg: какаови зърна
ca: gra de cacau
da: kakaobønne, kakaobønner
de: Kakaobohne, Kakaobohnen
es: Cacao en grano
et: kakaooad, kakaopuu seemned
fi: kaakaopapu, kaakaopavut
fr: fèves de cacao, grains de cacao, cacao en grains
hr: kakaovog zrna, kakaa u zrnu, zrna kakaovca
hu: kakaóbab
id: Biji kakao
it: fave di cacao, semi di cacao, granelli di cacao
ja: カカオ豆
mk: какаово зрно
ms: Biji koko
nl: cacaobonen, cacaoboon
pl: ziarno kakaowca
ru: какао-бобы
sq: Gatim me kakao
sv: kakaoböna, kakaobönor
uk: Какао-боби
zh: 可可豆

en: cocoa nibs, cocoa bean chips
da: kakaonibs
de: Kakaonibs, Kakao-Nibs, kakaobohnenchips, Kakaokernbruch
es: pepitas de cacao, trozos de habas de cacao, trocitos de pepitas de cacao
fi: Kaakaopapusipsit
fr: éclats de fèves de cacao
hr: kakao zrnca
it: granella di semi di cacao, scaglie di cacao, granella di fave di cacao, granella di cacao
ja: カカオニブ

fr: éclats de fèves de cacao torréfiés
es: trozos de habas de cacao tostados, trocitos de pepitas de cacao tostadas
it: granella di fave di cacao tostate
nl: geroosterde schilfers van cacaobonen

es: trocitos de pepitas de cacao caramelizadas, pepitas de cacao caramelizadas, trozos de habas de cacao caramelizados
fr: éclats de fèves de cacao caramélisés
it: granella caramellata di semi di cacao
nl: gekaramelliseerde schilfers van cacaobonen